Massachusetts, session 194th, S1595.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 54B of Chapter 71, as appearing in the 2014 Official Edition, is hereby amended 
by inserting the following after the word "lunchrooms":-   
A public school district or non-public school, as defined by the department of education, 
may register with the department for the purpose of permitting school personnel to administer 
epinephrine by auto injector in a life-threatening situation during the school day when a school 
nurse is not immediately available, including field trips, provided that the following conditions 
are met: 
1. the school committee, or, in the case of a non-public school, the chief administrative 
officer, approves policies governing the administration of epinephrine; 

of 3 10  2. the designated school nurse leader or responsible nurse has final decision making 
authority about the program; 
3. the school personnel authorized to administer epinephrine by auto injector are trained 
and tested for competency by the designated school nurse leader or responsible school nurse, or 
school nurses designated by this person, in accordance with standards and a curriculum 
established by the department; 
4. the designated school nurse leader or responsible school nurse manages and has final 
decision making authority about the program; 
5. the epinephrine is administered for an emergency case of anaphylactic shock, as 
deemed by a properly trained and authorized school personnel, or in accordance with an 
individual medication administration plan; 
6. when epinephrine is administered, there shall be immediate notification of the local 
emergency medical services system, followed by notification of the student’s parent(s) or 
guardian(s) or, if the parent(s) or guardian(s) are not available, any other designated person(s), 
the school nurse, the student’s physician, and the school physician, to the extent possible; 
Any school personnel, properly trained and authorized to administer epinephrine, who 
provides, administers, or assists in the administration of epinephrine to a student believed in 
good faith to be having an anaphylactic reaction, or is the prescriber of the epinephrine, shall not 
be liable for any civil damages for ordinary negligence in acts or omissions resulting from the 
rendering of such treatment. 

of 3 30  Epinephrine may lawfully be prescribed and dispensed to a public school district or non-
public school registered with the Department. For purposes of this chapter, any such prescription 
shall be regarded as being issued for a legitimate medical purpose in the usual course of 
professional practice.  The school district or nonpublic school may maintain said epinephrine kit 
in a secure but unlocked place, as determined by the school nurse leader or responsible school.